Montana, session 2025, HB643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 7-32-2242, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-32-2242. Use of detention center -- payment of costs. (1) Local government, state, and federal
law enforcement and correctional agencies may use any detention center for the confinement of arrested
persons and the punishment of offenders, under conditions imposed by law and with the consent of the
governing body responsible for the detention center.
(2) (a) Except as provided in 7-32-2245, if a person is confined in a detention center by an
arresting agency not responsible for the operation of the detention center, the actual costs of holding the
person in confinement must be paid by the arresting agency unless otherwise agreed to by the arresting
agency and the operator of the detention center.
(b) If a city or town commits a person to the detention center of the county in which the city or town
is located for a reason other than detention pending trial for or detention for service of a sentence for violating
an ordinance of that city or town, the costs must be paid by the county, except as provided in 7-32-2245. If the
department of corrections is the arresting agency and the inmate is a probation violator, the costs must be paid
by the county in which the district court that retains jurisdiction over the inmate is located, except as provided in
7-32-2245.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 643
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 643
(c) The department of corrections is responsible to pay for paying the actual costs for defendants
following the pronouncement of sentence pursuant to 46-19-101.
(d)(d) Payments must be made to the government unit responsible for the detention center or to the
administrator operating a private detention center under an agreement provided for in 7-32-2201 on
presentation of a claim to the arresting agency ..
(e)(e) For the purposes of this section, "actual costs" of a detention center is defined as the greater
of:
(i) the daily per inmate provider rate for crossroads correctional facility less 10%; or
(ii) $82 of a detention center is defined as the greater of:
(i) the daily per inmate provider rate for an operator of a private correctional facility in Montana
with a population of more than 500 state inmates that contracts with the department of corrections less 10%; or
(ii) $82.
(3) If a person is a fugitive from justice from an out-of-state jurisdiction, the costs, including medical
expenses, of holding the person in a detention center pending extradition must be paid by the out-of-state
jurisdiction."
Section 2. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $6 million from the state special revenue
account created in 50-1-119 to the department of public health and human services for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025. The funds may be used only to reimburse counties for the costs of holding in confinement in
detention centers individuals who are awaiting evaluation or examination under 46-14-101, 46-14-202, 46-14-
221, or 46-14-311, or who have been committed to the custody of the director of public health and human
services and are awaiting placement in appropriate facilities pursuant to 46-14-221, 46-14-301, 46-14-302, 46-
14-304, 46-14-312, or 46-19-101.
(2) The department of public health and human services shall reimburse counties at a rate of
135% of the daily per inmate provider rate of an operator of a private correctional facility in Montana with a
population of more than 500 state inmates that contracts with the department of corrections.
(3) The legislature intends that this is a one-time-only appropriation.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 643
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 643
Section 3. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 643
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 643, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 643
INTRODUCED BY T. SHARP, M. VINTON, S. KELLY, S. GIST, G. KMETZ
AN ACT REVISING PAYMENT OF COSTS FOR USE OF A DETENTION CENTER; REVISING THE
DEFINITION OF "ACTUAL COSTS"; REQUIRING THE ARRESTING AGENCY, THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES TO PAY THE
ACTUAL COSTS PLUS 10% OF HOLDING A PERSON IN CONFINEMENT IN A DETENTION CENTER UNDER
CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES; REVISING THE DEFINITION OF "ACTUAL COSTS"; PROVIDING AN
APPROPRIATION; AND AMENDING SECTION 7-32-2242, MCA; AND PROVIDING A TERMINATION DATE.”